Massachusetts, session 194th, S1348.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 29 of chapter 149 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022 Official Edition,
is hereby amended by inserting the following paragraph:-
A party to a contract for construction having a duty, whether by law or by contract, to
maintain a safe workplace or to comply with applicable safety standards, may not transfer the
responsibility to pay for, defend against, or provide insurance covering claims, liabilities, fines,
or damages to the extent caused by that party’s breach of such duty. Any provision in a contract
for construction which purports to transfer any such responsibility shall be void and
unenforceable as against public policy.
of 1